Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1428
Transfer of tobacco license.

In case of the sale of a business where the owner has a license hereunder, the licensing authority may authorize such license to be transferred to the purchaser. In case of a change of location by any licensee hereunder, the licensing authority may transfer such license to the new location.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 9, p. 403;

C.S.1922, § 9857;

C.S.1929, § 28-1031;

R.S.1943, § 28-1030.